Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-932
Agency action; judicial review; limitation; negotiated rule; judicial review; treatment.

Any agency action relating to establishing, assisting, or terminating a negotiated rulemaking committee under the Negotiated Rulemaking Act shall not be subject to judicial review. Nothing in this section shall bar judicial review if such judicial review is otherwise provided by law. A rule which is the product of negotiated rulemaking prior to formal adoption pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act and is later subject to judicial review shall not be accorded greater deference by a court than a rule which is the product of the rulemaking procedure of the Administrative Procedure Act alone.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.